sk-SK: Typ zadnej osky: Skrutkovacia os s maticami; Os s integrovanou prevodovkou; Rýchloupinák (QR) 9 mm; Pevná os 10 mm; Pevná os 12 mm; Iné
hu: Hátsó tengely típusa: Csavaros tengely; Agyváltós tengely; Gyorszár (QR) 9 mm; Átütőtengely 10 mm; Átütőtengely 12 mm; Egyéb
zh-TW: 後軸類型: 螺栓固定軸; 內變速花鼓軸; 快拆 (QR) 9 mm; 貫通軸 10 mm; 貫通軸 12 mm; 其他
de: Hinterachstyp: Schraubachse mit Muttern; Getriebenabenachse; Schnellspanner (QR) 9 mm; Steckachse 10 mm; Steckachse 12 mm; Sonstige
fi: Taka-akselin tyyppi: Pulttikiinnitteinen mutteriakseli; Napavaihteiston akseli; Pikalinkku (QR) 9 mm; Läpiakseli 10 mm; Läpiakseli 12 mm; Muu
lt-LT: Galinės ašies tipas: Priveržiama veržlinė ašis; Vidinės pavarų stebulės ašis; Greitai atleidžiama (QR) 9 mm; Perveriamoji ašis 10 mm; Perveriamoji ašis 12 mm; Kita
ja: 後車軸タイプ: ボルトオン ナット止めアクスル; 内装変速ハブアクスル; クイックリリース (QR) 9 mm; スルーアクスル 10 mm; スルーアクスル 12 mm; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta stražnje osovine: Osovina s maticom na zavrtanje; Osovina glavčine s unutarnjim mjenjačem; Brzo otpuštanje (QR) 9 mm; Thru-axle 10 mm; Thru-axle 12 mm; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de eixo traseiro: Eixo aparafusado com porca; Eixo de cubo com mudanças internas; Aperto rápido (QR) de 9 mm; Eixo passante de 10 mm; Eixo passante de 12 mm; Outro
it: Tipo di assale posteriore: Perno filettato con dadi; Perno mozzo con cambio interno; Sgancio rapido (QR) 9 mm; Perno passante 10 mm; Perno passante 12 mm; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul punții spate: Ax cu prindere prin piulițe; Ax pentru butuc cu viteze integrate; Eliberare rapidă (QR) 9 mm; Ax traversant 10 mm; Ax traversant 12 mm; Altele
nb: Bakakseltype: Aksel med mutter; Aksel for innvendig girnav; Hurtigkobling (QR) 9 mm; Stikkaksel 10 mm; Stikkaksel 12 mm; Annet
nl: Achteras type: As met moerbevestiging; As voor naafversnelling; Snelspanner (QR) 9 mm; Steekas 10 mm; Steekas 12 mm; Overig
th: ประเภทเพลาหลัง: แกนล้อแบบขันน็อต; แกนดุมล้อเกียร์ดุม; แกนปลดเร็ว (QR) 9 มม.; แกนสอด 10 มม.; แกนสอด 12 มม.; อื่นๆ
en: Rear axle type: Bolt-on nutted axle; Internally geared hub axle; Quick release (QR) 9 mm; Thru-axle 10 mm; Thru-axle 12 mm; Other
cs: Typ zadní nápravy: Osa na matice; Osa vícerychlostního náboje; Rychloupínák (QR) 9 mm; Pevná osa 10 mm; Pevná osa 12 mm; Ostatní
ko: 후륜 액슬 유형: 볼트온 너트 액슬; 내장 기어 허브 액슬; 퀵 릴리스(QR) 9 mm; 스루 액슬 10 mm; 스루 액슬 12 mm; 기타
da: Bagakseltype: Bolt-on aksel med møtrikker; Aksel til indvendigt gearnav; Quick release (QR) 9 mm; Thru-axle 10 mm; Thru-axle 12 mm; Andet
zh-CN: 后轴类型: 螺母固定式车轴; 内变速花鼓车轴; 快拆 (QR) 9 mm; 桶轴 10 mm; 桶轴 12 mm; 其他
sv: Bakaxeltyp: Bultad axel med mutter; Axel för navväxel; Snabbkoppling (QR) 9 mm; Genomgående axel 10 mm; Genomgående axel 12 mm; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta zadnje osi: Os z matico (privijačena); Os pesta z notranjimi prestavami; Hitri zatezalec (QR) 9 mm; Prečna os 10 mm; Prečna os 12 mm; Drugo
ru: Тип задней оси: Ось с гайками; Ось планетарной втулки; Эксцентрик (QR) 9 мм; Сквозная ось 10 мм; Сквозная ось 12 мм; Другое
pl: Typ tylnej osi: Oś przykręcana (na nakrętki); Oś piasty planetarnej; Szybkozamykacz (QR) 9 mm; Sztywna oś 10 mm; Sztywna oś 12 mm; Inne
es: Tipo de eje trasero: Eje atornillado con tuercas; Eje de buje con cambios internos; Cierre rápido (QR) de 9 mm; Eje pasante de 10 mm; Eje pasante de 12 mm; Otro
vi: Loại trục sau: Trục bắt đai ốc; Trục đùm số trong; Tháo lắp nhanh (QR) 9 mm; Trục xuyên 10 mm; Trục xuyên 12 mm; Khác
fr: Type d’axe arrière: Axe boulonné à écrou; Axe de moyeu à vitesses intégrées; Attache rapide (QR) 9 mm; Axe traversant 10 mm; Axe traversant 12 mm; Autre
tr: Arka aks tipi: Cıvatalı somunlu mil; İçten vitesli göbek mili; Quick release (QR) 9 mm; Sokma mil 10 mm; Sokma mil 12 mm; Diğer
pt-BR: Traseiro eixo tipo: Eixo com porca parafusado; Eixo de cubo com marcha interna; Liberação rápida (QR) 9 mm; Eixo passante 10 mm; Eixo passante 12 mm; Outro
bg-BG: Тип задна ос: Ос с гайки; Ос за вътрешни скорости; Бързо освобождаване (QR) 9 mm; Проходна ос 10 mm; Проходна ос 12 mm; Други
el: Τύπος πίσω άξονα: Βιδωτός άξονας με παξιμάδια; Άξονας κέντρου με εσωτερικές ταχύτητες; Ταχείας απασφάλισης (QR) 9 mm; Περαστός άξονας 10 mm; Περαστός άξονας 12 mm; Άλλο